Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.155 RCW to read as follows:(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and maintain a statewide online system for individualized education programs. In developing the online system, the superintendent of public instruction must consult with a nonprofit information processing cooperative authorized under RCW 28A.310.180.(2) The purpose of the online system is to:(a) Provide a uniform, centralized platform for creating and managing individualized education programs;(b) Ensure compliance with federal and state special education requirements;(c) Improve the efficiency and effectiveness of individualized education program development and oversight; and(d) Improve educator collaboration and serve as an instructional tool designed to improve educational outcomes by aligning individualized supports and services with evidence-based instructional practices.(3) The online system must:(a) Have a statewide model that is made available at no cost to school districts, charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW;(b) Incorporate safeguards to protect confidential student information, including compliance with the federal family educational rights and privacy act and any other applicable privacy laws;(c) Allow for secure, role-based access so that only authorized users may view or modify individualized education programs;(d) Be able to integrate emerging technologies to continually enhance its functionality and effectiveness;(e) Ensure that individualized education programs can show evidence of access to grade-level standards, reasonable progress, improved student outcomes, and students' strengths and needs;(f) Include integrated language support and translation services;(g) Allow for robust family engagement, including access to information about student progress that includes both qualitative and quantitative data and that provides information about how individualized education program goals connect to grade-level standards; and(h) Comply with applicable state and federal accessibility standards.(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure statewide professional development opportunities are available to educators, administrators, and families to support the effective use and implementation of the statewide online system for individualized education programs, including targeted technical assistance.--- END ---